Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.710

Final authority.

Reports and recommendations by the planning agency on all matters shall be advisory only, and final determination shall rest with the administrative body, official, or the board whichever has authority to decide under applicable law.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.710. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 71.]